Mississippi, session 2026, HB1658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Division of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority shall do the following: (a)  Make an inventory of assets making up the gospel music culture that could be developed into a program for domestic and international tourism and opportunities for investment. (b)  Establish a statewide Mississippi "Gospel Music Trail" infrastructure to offer to tourists and targeted groups a structured tour of Mississippi gospel music historical sites and performance venues. (c)  Designate specific sites for the erection of appropriate Mississippi Gospel Music Trail markers to offer to tourists and targeted groups a structured tour of Mississippi gospel music historical sites and performance venues.  The text for the Mississippi Gospel Music Trail markers must be approved by the division.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall cooperate with the division by erecting and maintaining the markers that have been approved by the division. (d)  Coordinate the Mississippi Gospel Music Trail program with organizations and other entities in order to share resources and information to ensure a comprehensive approach to marketing the gospel music and gospel music culture in Mississippi. (e)  Coordinate the Mississippi Gospel Music Trail marketing plan with any existing state historic preservation program in order to identify and preserve gospel music historic properties and determine the eligibility of such properties for listing on the National Register of Historic Places, and prepare nominations of such sites. For purposes of this section, the term "gospel music" means gospel, Christian, praise and worship, and related music genres and the culture that created it. (2)  The Division of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority shall submit a report, including any proposed legislation, to the Governor and to the Legislature before the convening of the 2027 Regular Session.  The report must include a comprehensive state plan for marketing gospel music history as specifically provided for in this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.